Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.59
Emergency management; supplies and services from private entities; funds; disposition.

Whenever any person, firm, or corporation offers to the state or to any political subdivision thereof services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan for purposes of disaster response and emergency management, the state, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting through its principal executive officer or governing body, may accept such offer. Upon such acceptance the Governor of the state or principal executive officer or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, subject to the terms of the offer. All such funds received on behalf of the state shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 10(4), p. 1082;

Laws 1965, c. 342, § 3, p. 974;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.25;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 39;

Laws 2003, LB 403, § 10.